Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 1.1 Cooperation with Federal Government

40.1-1.1-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to establish, extend, and strengthen the mental health services relating to the causes, diagnosis, and treatment of psychiatric disorders and in the providing for developing the most effective methods of prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of psychiatric disorders.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2113, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

26-1-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-1.1-2.
Designation of agency to cooperate with federal government.

The state department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is hereby designated as the agency of this state to cooperate with the federal government, its agency, or instrumentality, in establishing, extending, and strengthening the services described in §

40.1-1.1-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2113, § 2; G.L. 1956, § 26-1-2; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-1.1-3.
Powers of department.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is hereby authorized:

To develop jointly with the federal government through its appropriate agency or instrumentality, a plan or plans for the purpose specified in §

40.1-1.1-1

and to make rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable for the administration of plans and the provisions of this chapter;

To receive and expend in accordance with those plans any funds made available to the department by the federal government, the state, or its political subdivision for that purpose;

To develop services and to provide encouragement in assistance of adequate methods of treatment of psychiatric disorders in accordance with those plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2113, § 3; G.L. 1956, § 26-1-3; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.

40.1-1.1-4.
Receipt and disbursement of federal funds.

The general treasurer of the state shall receive funds granted to the state for the purposes specified in §

40.1-1.1-1

by the federal government; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much thereof as may be required, from time to time, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2113, § 4; G.L. 1956, § 26-1-4; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1.